Washington statutes.
RCW 3.72.005

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Court" when used without further qualification means the district court under chapter 3.30 RCW, the municipal department under chapter 3.46 RCW, or the municipal court under chapter 3.50 or 35.20 RCW.

(2) "Traffic infraction" means those acts defined as traffic infractions by RCW 46.63.020.

(3) "Transit infraction" means an infraction issued by a transit authority as defined in RCW 9.91.025(2)(c), including those infractions authorized under RCW 35.58.580, 36.57A.230, and 81.112.220.

(4) "Youth court" means an alternative method of hearing and disposing of traffic infractions, transit infractions, or civil infractions for juveniles age sixteen or seventeen.

[ 2020 c 191 s 1; 2017 c 9 s 1; 2002 c 237 s 1.]